lexd_components/verbs_reg.lexd
ագուցել:ագուց
ազատագրել:ազատագր
ազատել:ազատ
ազդարարել:ազդարար
ազդել:ազդ
ածել:ած
ածիլել:ածիլ
ակնարկել:ակնարկ
ակնկալել:ակնկալ
ահաբեկել:ահաբեկ
աղաղակել:աղաղակ
աղանձել:աղանձ
աղաչել:աղաչ
աղարտել:աղարտ
աղաւաղել:աղաւաղ
աղել:աղ
աղերսել:աղերս
աղճատել:աղճատ
աղմկել:աղմկ
աղտոտել:աղտոտ
աղօթել:աղօթ
աճապարել:աճապար
ամբաստանել:ամբաստան
ամբարել:ամբար
ամոքել:ամոք
ամպել:ամպ
ամրապնդել:ամրապնդ
ամփոփել:ամփոփ
այլանդակել:այլանդակ
այպանել:այպան
այրել:այր
այցելել:այցել
անարգել:անարգ
անգոսնել:անգոսն
անդամատել:անդամատ
անթեղել:անթեղ
անիծել:անիծ
անձնաւորել:անձնաւոր
անձրեւել:անձրեւ
անճիտել:անճիտ
անուանարկել:անուանարկ
անուանել:անուան
անպատուել:անպատու
անջատել:անջատ
անտեսել:անտես
աշակերտել:աշակերտ
աշխարել:աշխար
ապազինել:ապազին
ապականել:ապական
ապահովագրել:ապահովագր
ապահովել:ապահով
ապաշխարել:ապաշխար
ապացուցել:ապացուց
ապխտել:ապխտ
ապսպրել:ապսպր
ապտակել:ապտակ
առաջադրել:առաջադր
առաջարկել:առաջարկ
առարկել:առարկ
առաքել:առաք
առեւանգել:առեւանգ
առթել:առթ
առինքնել:առինքն
առկախել:առկախ
ասեղագործել:ասեղագործ
ասպատակել:ասպատակ
աստիճանազրկե:աստիճանազր
ատել:ատ
արածել:արած
արաջնորդել:արաջնորդ
արատաւորել:արատաւոր
արգասաւորել:արգասաւոր
արգելակել:արգելակ
արգելափակել:արգելափակ
արգիլել:արգիլ
արդիւնաւորել:արդիւնաւոր
արդուկել:արդուկ
արժեզրկել:արժեզրկ
արժել:արժ
արժեւորել:արժեւոր
արժէքազրկել:արժէքազրկ
արժէքաւորել:արժէքաւոր
արիւնել:արիւն
արծարծել:արծարծ
արծնել:արծն
արհամարհել:արհամարհ
արձագանգել:արձագանգ
արձակել:արձակ
արձանագրել:արձանագր
արշաւել:արշաւ
արտագծել:արտագծ
արտագրել:արտագր
արտադրել:արտադր
արտածել:արտած
արտահանել:արտահան
արտայայտել:արտայայտ
արտաշնչել:արտաշնչ
արտասանել:արտասան
արտասուել:արտասու
արտատպել:արտատպ
արտաքսել:արտաքս
արտօնել:արտօն
աւաղել:աւաղ
աւանդել:աւանդ
աւարել:աւար
աւարտել:աւարտ
աւետել:աւետ
աւերել:աւեր
աւրել:աւր
աքացել:աքաց
աքսորել:աքսոր
դաւաճանել:դաւաճան
եզերել:եզեր
եզրափակել:եզրափակ
եղանակաւորել:եղանակաւոր
եղանակել:եղանակ
եղծանել:եղծան
եղծել:եղծ
ենթադրել:ենթադր
ենթարկել:ենթարկ
եպերել:եպեր
երազել:երազ
երաշխաւորել:երաշխաւոր
երապատկել:երապատկ
երգել:երգ
երեւակայել:երեւակայ
երեքնել:երեքն
երթեւեկել:երթեւեկ
երկախօսել:երկախօս
երկարաձգել:երկարաձգ
երկարել:երկար
երկնել:երկն
երկպառակել:երկպառակ
երկրորդել:երկրորդ
երկրպագել:երկրպագ
երկփեղկել:երկփեղկ
երնել:երն
երփնել:երփն
եփել:եփ
էջադրել:էջադր
ըմբերանել:ըմբերան
ըմբոշխնել:ըմբոշխն
ըմբռնել:ըմբռն
ըմպել:ըմպ
ընդառաջել:ընդառաջ
ընդարձակել:ընդարձակ
ընդգծել:ընդգծ
ընդգրկել:ընդգրկ
ընդդիմաբանել:ընդդիմաբան
ընդդիմախօսել:ընդդիմախօս
ընդելուզել:ընդելուզ
ընդլայնել:ընդլայն
ընդհատել:ընդհատ
ընդմիջել:ընդմիջ
ընդոտնել:ընդոտն
ընդօրինակել:ընդօրինակ
ընթեռնել:ընթեռն
ընթերցել:ընթերց
ընթրել:ընթր
ընծայել:ընծայ
ընկլուզել:ընկլուզ
ընկղմել:ընկղմ
ընկճել:ընկճ
ընձեռել:ընձեռ
ընձիւղել:ընձիւղ
ընտրել:ընտր
իմաստաւորել:իմաստաւոր
իշխել:իշխ
իրագործել:իրագործ
իւղել:իւղ
իւղոտել:իւղոտ
ուզել:ուզ
ուխտել:ուխտ
ուղարկել:ուղարկ
ուղեւորել:ուղեւոր
ուղղագրել:ուղղագր
ուղղել:ուղղ
ունկնդրել:ունկնդր
ուսել:ուս
ուսումնասիրել:ուսումնասիր
ուրդել:ուրդ
ուրուագծել:ուրուագծ
ուրուագրել:ուրուագր
օգնել:օգն
օգտագործել:օգտագործ
օգտել:օգտ
օժանդակել:օժանդակ
օժտել:օժտ
օծանել:օծան
օծել:օծ
օղակել:օղակ
օճառել:օճառ
օսլայել:օսլայ
օտարել:օտար
օրինադրել:օրինադր
օրինակել:օրինակ
օրհնաբանել:օրհնաբան
օրհնել:օրհն
օրհներգել:օրհներգ
օրօրել:օրօր
բաբախել:բաբախ
բազմապատկել:բազմապատկ
բաժանորդագրել:բաժանորդագր
բաժնել:բաժն
բախել:բախ
բաղադրել:բաղադր
բաղդատել:բաղդատ
բամբասել:բամբաս
բանադրել:բանադր
բանաձեւել:բանաձեւ
բանսարկել:բանսարկ
բանտարկել:բանտարկ
բաշխել:բաշխ
բառաչել:բառաչ
բասրել:բասր
բարբանջել:բարբանջ
բարդել:բարդ
բարեբանել:բարեբան
բարեզարդել:բարեզարդ
բարելաւել:բարելաւ
բարեխառնել:բարեխառն
բարեխօսել:բարեխօս
բարեկարգել:բարեկարգ
բարեմաղթել:բարեմաղթ
բարենորոգել:բարենորոգ
բարեւել:բարեւ
բարձել:բարձ
բարւոքել:բարւոք
բացականչել:բացականչ
բացայայտել:բացայայտ
բացասել:բացաս
բացատրել:բացատր
բաւարարել:բաւարար
բաւել:բաւ
բեկանել:բեկան
բեկել:բեկ
բեղմնաւորել:բեղմնաւոր
բեմադրել:բեմադր
բեռնաւորել:բեռնաւոր
բեւեռել:բեւեռ
բզքտել:բզքտ
բժշկել:բժշկ
բնաջնջել:բնաջնջ
բնորոշել:բնորոշ
բնութագրել:բնութագր
բոլորել:բոլոր
բոհրել:բոհր
բողոքել:բողոք
բովանդակել:բովանդակ
բորբոքել:բորբոք
բուժել:բուժ
բուրել:բուր
բռել:բռ
բռնաբարել:բռնաբար
բռնագրաւել:բռնագրաւ
բռնադատել:բռնադատ
բռնել:բռն
բռնցքահարել:բռնցքահար
բրդել:բրդ
բրել:բր
բօթել:բօթ
գալարել:գալար
գահազրկել:գահազրկ
գահակալել:գահակալ
գահավիժել:գահավիժ
գաղթել:գաղթ
գաճել:գաճ
գամել:գամ
գայթակղել:գայթակղ
գայթել:գայթ
գանակոծել:գանակոծ
գանահարել:գանահար
գանել:գան
գանձել:գանձ
գգուել:գգու
գեղագրել:գեղագր
գեղազարդել:գեղազարդ
գեղգեղել:գեղգեղ
գերագնահատել:գերագնահատ
գերադասել:գերադաս
գերազանցել:գերազանց
գերել:գեր
գերեվարել:գերեվար
գերծել:գերծ
գերփել:գերփ
գզգզել:գզգզ
գզել:գզ
գիշատել:գիշատ
գիշերել:գիշեր
գլել:գլ
գլխատել:գլխատ
գլխաւորել:գլխաւոր
գլորել:գլոր
գլտորել:գլտոր
գծագրել:գծագր
գծել:գծ
գճել:գճ
գնահատել:գնահատ
գնդակահարել:գնդակահար
գնել:գն
գոհաբանել:գոհաբան
գոչել:գոչ
գովաբանել:գովաբան
գովել:գով
գործադրել:գործադր
գործածել:գործած
գործել:գործ
գոցել:գոց
գուժել:գուժ
գումարել:գումար
գուշակել:գուշակ
գրանցել:գրանց
գրաւագրել:գրաւագր
գրաւել:գրաւ
գրաքննել:գրաքնն
գրգռել:գրգռ
գրել:գր
գրկել:գրկ
գրոհել:գրոհ
գրպանել:գրպան
գօտեպնդել:գօտեպնդ
գօտեւորել:գօտեւոր
դակել:դակ
դայլայլել:դայլայլ
դանակահարել:դանակահար
դանդաչել:դանդաչ
դաշնաւորել:դաշնաւոր
դաշունել:դաշուն
դասախօսել:դասախօս
դասակարգել:դասակարգ
դասաւանդել:դասաւանդ
դասաւորել:դասաւոր
դասել:դաս
դաստիարակել:դաստիարակ
դատապարտել:դատապարտ
դատարկել:դատարկ
դատափետել:դատափետ
դատել:դատ
դարբնել:դարբն
դարմանել:դարման
դարովել:դարով
դաւադրել:դաւադր
դաւել:դաւ
դափել:դափ
դեղել:դեղ
դիազննել:դիազնն
դիահերձել:դիահերձ
դիել:դի
դիզել:դիզ
դիմագրաւել:դիմագրաւ
դիմադարձել:դիմադարձ
դիմադրել:դիմադր
դիմակազերծել:դիմակազերծ
դիմաւորել:դիմաւոր
դիմել:դիմ
դիտել:դիտ
դիւթել:դիւթ
դղրդել:դղրդ
դողդոջել:դողդոջ
դոփել:դոփ
դրդել:դրդ
դրժել:դրժ
դրոշմել:դրոշմ
դրուատել:դրուատ
դրսեւորել:դրսեւոր
դրօշազարդել:դրօշազարդ
զանազանել:զանազան
զանգահարել:զանգահար
զանգել:զանգ
զառածել:զառած
զառանցել:զառանց
զատել:զատ
զարդանկարել:զարդանկար
զարդարել:զարդար
զգայռել:զգայռ
զգեստաւորել:զգեստաւոր
զգետնել:զգետն
զգլխել:զգլխ
զեկուցել:զեկուց
զեղել:զեղ
զեղծել:զեղծ
զեղչել:զեղչ
զենել:զեն
զետեղել:զետեղ
զերծել:զերծ
զինաթափել:զինաթափ
զինել:զին
զինուորագրել:զինուորագր
զմռսել:զմռս
զննել:զնն
զոհել:զոհ
զուգադրել:զուգադր
զուգակշռել:զուգակշռ
զուգակցել:զուգակց
զուգաւորել:զուգաւոր
զուգել:զուգ
զուգորդել:զուգորդ
զսպել:զսպ
զտել:զտ
զրաբանել:զրաբան
զրահաւորել:զրահաւոր
զրահել:զրահ
զրաւել:զրաւ
զրկել:զրկ
զրուցատրել:զրուցատր
զրուցել:զրուց
զրպարտել:զրպարտ
զօդել:զօդ
զօշաքաղել:զօշաքաղ
զօրել:զօր
թագադրել:թագադր
թագաւորել:թագաւոր
թաթախել:թաթախ
թաթաւել:թաթաւ
թաթխել:թաթխ
թալանել:թալան
թալլել:թալլ
թախանձել:թախանձ
թակարդել:թակարդ
թակել:թակ
թաղել:թաղ
թամբել:թամբ
թանչել:թանչ
թառանչել:թառանչ
թասել:թաս
թարգմանել:թարգման
թարթափել:թարթափ
թարթել:թարթ
թաւալել:թաւալ
թափահարել:թափահար
թափանցել:թափանց
թափել:թափ
թելադրել:թելադր
թերագնահատել:թերագնահատ
թերթել:թերթ
թեւածել:թեւած
թեւակոխել:թեւակոխ
թեւարկել:թեւարկ
թեւել:թեւ
թեքել:թեք
թիավարել:թիավար
թլփատել:թլփատ
թխել:թխ
թխմել:թխմ
թխսել:թխս
թղթատել:թղթատ
թմբկահարել:թմբկահար
թողլքել:թողլք
թոյլատրել:թոյլատր
թոպահարել:թոպահար
թոպել:թոպ
թովել:թով
թորել:թոր
թուագրել:թուագր
թուարկել:թուարկ
թուել:թու
թունաւորել:թունաւոր
թռչկոտել:թռչկոտ
թրատել:թրատ
թրծել:թրծ
թրմել:թրմ
թրջել:թրջ
թքել:թք
թօթափել:թօթափ
թօթուել:թօթու
ժահահոտել:ժահահոտ
ժամադրել:ժամադր
ժամանել:ժաման
ժայթքել:ժայթք
ժառանգազրկել:ժառանգազրկ
ժառանգել:ժառանգ
ժխտել:ժխտ
ժողովել:ժողով
ժողվել:ժողվ
ժտել:ժտ
լակել:լակ
լայնել:լայն
լարել:լար
լափել:լափ
լափլիզել:լափլիզ
լզել:լզ
լզուըռտել:լզուըռտ
լիազօրել:լիազօր
լիզել:լիզ
լլկել:լլկ
լծել:լծ
լծորդել:լծորդ
լղրճել:լղրճ
լմել:լմ
լնդել:լնդ
լոլոզել:լոլոզ
լուել:լու
լուծել:լուծ
լուսաբանել:լուսաբան
լուսազարդել:լուսազարդ
լուսանկարել:լուսանկար
լուսաւորել:լուսաւոր
լուսնել:լուսն
լպրծել:լպրծ
լռել:լռ
լսել:լս
լրտեսել:լրտես
լփռտել:լփռտ
լքել:լք
խաբել:խաբ
խազել:խազ
խաթարել:խաթար
խախալել:խախալ
խախանջել:խախանջ
խախտել:խախտ
խահագործել:խահագործ
խաղաղել:խաղաղ
խայթել:խայթ
խայտառակել:խայտառակ
խանգարել:խանգար
խանդավառել:խանդավառ
խանծել:խանծ
խանձել:խանձ
խանչել:խանչ
խաշել:խաշ
խաչակնքել:խաչակնք
խաչաձեւել:խաչաձեւ
խաչել:խաչ
խառատել:խառատ
խառել:խառ
խառնակել:խառնակ
խառնել:խառն
խարազանել:խարազան
խարանել:խարան
խարբալել:խարբալ
խարդախել:խարդախ
խարել:խար
խարխափել:խարխափ
խարխլել:խարխլ
խարկել:խարկ
խարշափել:խարշափ
խարսխել:խարսխ
խարտել:խարտ
խափանել:խափան
խեթել:խեթ
խեթկել:խեթկ
խեղաթիւրել:խեղաթիւր
խեղդել:խեղդ
խեղել:խեղ
խզել:խզ
խթանել:խթան
խթել:խթ
խիզախել:խիզախ
խլել:խլ
խլրտել:խլրտ
խխնջել:խխնջ
խծբծել:խծբծ
խճողել:խճող
խմբագրել:խմբագր
խմբաւորել:խմբաւոր
խմբել:խմբ
խմել:խմ
խմորել:խմոր
խնամել:խնամ
խնայել:խնայ
խնդրել:խնդր
խնկարկել:խնկարկ
խնկել:խնկ
խնջել:խնջ
խոզանակել:խոզանակ
խոթել:խոթ
խոխոջել:խոխոջ
խողխողել:խողխող
խոնարհել:խոնարհ
խոշտանգել:խոշտանգ
խոպոպել:խոպոպ
խոռել:խոռ
խոտել:խոտ
խորաչափել:խորաչափ
խորել:խոր
խորխատել:խորխատ
խորհրդածել:խորհրդած
խորհրդանշել:խորհրդանշ
խորշոմել:խորշոմ
խորովել:խորով
խորտակել:խորտակ
խոցել:խոց
խոցոտել:խոցոտ
խուզարկել:խուզարկ
խուզել:խուզ
խուժել:խուժ
խուսել:խուս
խուրտել:խուրտ
խռնել:խռն
խռովել:խռով
խտղտել:խտղտ
խտրել:խտր
խրախուսել:խրախուս
խրատել:խրատ
խրել:խր
խրխնջել:խրխնջ
խցանել:խցան
խցել:խց
խփել:խփ
ծալել:ծալ
ծալլել:ծալլ
ծախել:ծախ
ծածկել:ծածկ
ծականշել:ծականշ
ծակել:ծակ
ծակծկել:ծակծկ
ծակոտել:ծակոտ
ծաղկազարդել:ծաղկազարդ
ծաղկել:ծաղկ
ծաղրել:ծաղր
ծամածռել:ծամածռ
ծամել:ծամ
ծամծմել:ծամծմ
ծայրատել:ծայրատ
ծանակել:ծանակ
ծանուցել:ծանուց
ծանրաբեռնել:ծանրաբեռն
ծանօթագրել:ծանօթագր
ծառազարդել:ծառազարդ
ծառայել:ծառայ
ծարիրել:ծարիր
ծարուրել:ծարուր
ծաւալել:ծաւալ
ծափահարել:ծափահար
ծափել:ծափ
ծեթեւեթել:ծեթեւեթ
ծեծել:ծեծ
ծեփել:ծեփ
ծեքել:ծեք
ծխել:ծխ
ծխոտել:ծխոտ
ծծել:ծծ
ծնրադրել:ծնրադր
ծոմել:ծոմ
ծուատել:ծուատ
ծպտել:ծպտ
ծռել:ծռ
ծրագրել:ծրագր
ծրարել:ծրար
ծրտել:ծրտ
կազդուրել:կազդուր
կազմալուծել:կազմալուծ
կազմակերպել:կազմակերպ
կազմաւորել:կազմաւոր
կազմել:կազմ
կալանաւորել:կալանաւոր
կալանդել:կալանդ
կալանել:կալան
կալսել:կալս
կախակայել:կախակայ
կախարդել:կախարդ
կախել:կախ
կակազել:կակազ
կահաւորել:կահաւոր
կաղապարել:կաղապար
կաղկանձել:կաղկանձ
կամրջել:կամրջ
կայթել:կայթ
կայտռել:կայտռ
կանգնել:կանգն
կանխարգիլել:կանխարգիլ
կանխել:կանխ
կանոնադրել:կանոնադր
կանոնաւորել:կանոնաւոր
կանչել:կանչ
կանչուըռտել:կանչուըռտ
կաշառել:կաշառ
կաշկանդել:կաշկանդ
կապել:կապ
կապկել:կապկ
կապտել:կապտ
կառանել:կառան
կառաչել:կառաչ
կառավարել:կառավար
կառափել:կառափ
կառուցել:կառուց
կատակել:կատակ
կատարել:կատար
կատարելագործել:կատարելագործ
կարգադրել:կարգադր
կարգաւորել:կարգաւոր
կարգել:կարգ
կարել:կար
կարթել:կարթ
կարժել:կարժ
կարծել:կարծ
կարկաչել:կարկաչ
կարկառել:կարկառ
կարկատել:կարկատ
կարկափել:կարկափ
կարկել:կարկ
կարկտել:կարկտ
կարկտնել:կարկտն
կարճել:կարճ
կացինահարել:կացինահար
կափարել:կափար
կափկափել:կափկափ
կաքաւել:կաքաւ
կեղեքել:կեղեք
կեղծել:կեղծ
կեղուել:կեղու
կեղտոտել:կեղտոտ
կենդանագրել:կենդանագր
կերակրել:կերակր
կերպարանափոխել:կերպարանափոխ
կերտել:կերտ
կէտադրել:կէտադր
կէտկիտել:կէտկիտ
կթել:կթ
կիզել:կիզ
կիսել:կիս
կիրառել:կիրառ
կիրարկել:կիրարկ
կլայեկել:կլայեկ
կլլել:կլլ
կծել:կծ
կծկել:կծկ
կղպել:կղպ
կճել:կճ
կճռտել:կճռտ
կնճռոտել:կնճռոտ
կնքել:կնք
կշռադատել:կշռադատ
կշռել:կշռ
կշտամբել:կշտամբ
կոթողել:կոթող
կոխել:կոխ
կոխկռտել:կոխկռտ
կոծել:կոծ
կոկել:կոկ
կոկոզաբանել:կոկոզաբան
կոճկել:կոճկ
կոճոպել:կոճոպ
կոնծել:կոնծ
կոշկոճել:կոշկոճ
կոչել:կոչ
կոտորակել:կոտորակ
կոտորել:կոտոր
կոտրել:կոտր
կոտրտել:կոտրտ
կործանել:կործան
կործել:կործ
կորչել:կորչ
կուտակել:կուտակ
կուտել:կուտ
կոփել:կոփ
կպրապատել:կպրապատ
կռահել:կռահ
կռանահարել:կռանահար
կռանել:կռան
կռել:կռ
կռճտել:կռճտ
կռնչել:կռնչ
կռփահարել:կռփահար
կռփել:կռփ
կսմթել:կսմթ
կտակել:կտակ
կտել:կտ
կտտել:կտտ
կտրատել:կտրատ
կտրել:կտր
կտցահարել:կտցահար
կտցել:կտց
կրակել:կրակ
կրել:կր
կրթել:կրթ
կրծել:կրծ
կրկնաբանել:կրկնաբան
կրկնապատկել:կրկնապատկ
կրկնել:կրկն
կրկջել:կրկջ
կրկտել:կրկտ
կրճատել:կրճատ
կրճտել:կրճտ
կրտել:կրտ
կցել:կց
կցորդել:կցորդ
կքել:կք
հալածել:հալած
հալել:հալ
հակադարձել:հակադարձ
հակադրել:հակադր
հակազդել:հակազդ
հակակշռել:հակակշռ
հակաճառել:հակաճառ
հականեխել:հականեխ
հակել:հակ
հաղորդել:հաղորդ
հաճել:հաճ
համադասել:համադաս
համադրել:համադր
համախմբել:համախմբ
համակարգել:համակարգ
համակել:համակ
համապատասխանել:համապատասխան
համաջնջել:համաջնջ
համառօտել:համառօտ
համասփռել:համասփռ
համարել:համար
համբերել:համբեր
համեմատել:համեմատ
համեմել:համեմ
համետել:համետ
համոզել:համոզ
համտեսել:համտես
համրել:համր
հայթայթել:հայթայթ
հայհոյել:հայհոյ
հայցել:հայց
հանգանակել:հանգանակ
հանգուցել:հանգուց
հանգրիճել:հանգրիճ
հանդերձաւորել:հանդերձաւոր
հանդերձել:հանդերձ
հանդիսադրել:հանդիսադր
հանդուրժել:հանդուրժ
հանել:հան
հաշմել:հաշմ
հաշուել:հաշու
հաչել:հաչ
հաջել:հաջ
